kor.xfst
read lexc kor.lexc
define lexicon

define phonetize "<N>" -> 0,,
		 "<sg>" -> 0,,
		 "<pl>" -> 들,,
		 "<nom>" -> 0,,
		 "<loc>" -> 0,,
		 "<acc>" -> 의 ,,
		 "<N>" -> 0;


regex lexicon .o. phonetize;
